California statutes. Corporations Code
Any unincorporated association that is an organized medical society limiting its membership to licensed physicians and surgeons and that has as members at least 25 percent of the eligible physicians and surgeons residing in the area in which it functions (which must be at least one county) may, without incorporation, purchase, receive, own, hold, lease, mortgage, pledge, or encumber by deed of trust or otherwise, manage and sell all the real estate and other property as may be convenient for the purposes and objects of the association. However, if the association has less than 100 members, it shall have as members at least a majority of the eligible persons or licensees in the geographic area served by the particular association. The members of that unincorporated association are not individually or personally liable for debts or liabilities contracted or incurred by the association in the acquisition of lands or leases or the purchase, leasing, construction, repairing or furnishing of buildings or other structures to be used for the purposes of the association or for debts or liabilities contracted or incurred by the association in the carrying out or performance of any of its purposes; provided, that the purposes are within the purposes stated in Section 18020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Insignia [21300. - 21310.]

21300.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings set forth in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Association” includes any lodge, order, beneficial association, fraternal or beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, foundation, or federation, or any other society, organization, or association, or degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof. 

(b) “Insignia” includes badge, motto, button, decoration, charm, emblem, or rosette.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21301.

Any association, the principles and activities of which are not repugnant to the Constitution or laws of the United States or of this State, may register in the office of the Secretary of State a facsimile or description of its name or insignia and may by reregistration alter or cancel it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21302.

An association shall not be permitted to register any name or insignia similar to or so nearly resembling another name or insignia already registered as may be likely to deceive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21303.

Application for registration, alteration, or cancellation shall be made by the chief officer or officers of the association, upon a form prescribed to be provided by the Secretary of State. The registration shall be for the use and benefit and on behalf of the association, the individual members, and those hereafter to become members thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 129.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21304.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect a fee as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12191 of the Government Code for each registration made under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1000, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21305.

Upon the registration, the Secretary of State shall issue his certificate setting forth the fact of the registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21306.

The Secretary of State shall keep a properly indexed record of the registrations provided for by this chapter, which record shall also show any altered or canceled registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21307.

Any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses for any purpose a name or insignia registered under this chapter, unless he is entitled to use, wear, or exhibit the name or insignia under the constitution, bylaws, or rules of the association which registered it, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by fine of not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 76.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

21308.

Any court of competent jurisdiction may restrain by injunction:

1. The wearing or use of the insignia of any association, unless the person wearing or using the insignia is entitled to wear or use the insignia under the constitution, by-laws or rules of the association.

2. The use of the name of any association in a commercial venture, trade or business or in the solicitation of subscriptions for or advertising in any newspaper or other publication or in the solicitation of donations by any person representing directly or indirectly that such commercial venture, trade or business, newspaper or other publication or donation or solicitation for donation, is sponsored, endorsed or being offered by any association, unless the person so using the name is entitled to use the name under the constitution, by-laws or rules of the association or by the written consent of such association to such use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------

21309.

In any action under Section 21308 it is not necessary to allege or prove actual damages or the threat thereof, or actual injury or the threat thereof to the plaintiff, but in addition to injunctive relief any plaintiff in any such action is entitled to recover the amount of the actual damages, if any, sustained by such plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------

21310.

The use of the name or insignia of any association by any person not entitled to use the same under the constitution, by-laws, rules or regulations of the association or by the written consent of such association, is presumptive evidence of the unlawful use of or traffic in such name or insignia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Death Benefit Payments by Fraternal Societies [21400. - 21401.]

21400.

Whenever any fraternal society or lodge, other than a society subject to supervision by the Insurance Commissioner, pays benefits contingent on the death of a member, beneficiaries other than the following relatives by blood, marriage, or adoption shall be paid only the excess of the amount of the benefits over the expense of burial of the member: Spouse, relative by blood to the fourth degree, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepchildren, children by legal adoption, and parents by legal adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

Any fraternal society or lodge which makes any payment in violation of this chapter is liable for the expense of burial of the member to the extent of the amount paid in violation thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. JOINT STOCK ASSOCIATIONS [22000. - 22003.]

22000.

Every person who, without being authorized so to do, subscribes the name of another to or inserts the name of another in any prospectus, circular, or other advertisement, or announcement of any joint stock association, existing or intended to be formed, with intent to permit the document to be published, and thereby to lead persons to believe that the person whose name is so subscribed is an officer, agent, member, or promoter of such association, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

Every director, officer, or agent of any joint stock association is guilty of a felony who knowingly concurs in making, publishing, or posting either generally or privately to the stockholders or other persons, any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition, or book or notice containing any material statement which is false, or any untrue or wilfully or fraudulently exaggerated report, prospectus, account, statement of operations, values, business, profits, expenditures, or prospects, or any other paper or document intended to produce or give, or having a tendency to produce or give, the shares of stock in such association a greater value or a less apparent or market value than they really possess.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

(a) Every director, officer, or agent of any joint stock association, who knowingly receives or possesses himself of any property of the association, otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and, with intent to defraud, omits to make, or to cause or direct to be made, a full and true entry thereof in the books or accounts of the association, is guilty of a public offense.

(b) Every director, officer, agent, or member of any joint stock association who, with intent to defraud, destroys, alters, mutilates, or falsifies any of the books, papers, writings, or securities belonging to the association, or makes or concurs in making any false entries, or omits or concurs in omitting to
 make any material entry in any book of accounts or other record or document kept by the association, is guilty of a public offense.

(c) Each public offense specified in this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 46.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

For the purposes of this part every director of a joint stock association is deemed to possess such knowledge of the affairs of his association as to enable him to determine whether any act, proceeding, or omission of its directors is a violation of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS [23000. - 23006.]

23000.

“Real estate investment trust” as used in this part means any unincorporated association or trust formed to engage in business and managed by, or under the direction of, one or more trustees for the benefit of the holders or owners (hereinafter in this part “shareowners”) of transferable shares of beneficial interest in the trust estate (hereinafter in this part “shares”) and that meets one of the following two tests:

(a) It received, before the effective date of this part, an order, permit, or qualification from the Commissioner of Corporations pursuant to the provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 or any predecessor statute finding that it was a real estate investment trust, notwithstanding the subsequent amendment, suspension or revocation of any such finding, order,
 permit, or qualification, and it has for one or more of its three fiscal years immediately prior to the effective date of this part complied with, or in good faith filed a federal income tax return on the basis that it has complied with the requirements for real estate investment trusts set forth in Section 856 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code; or

(b) It is formed for the purpose of engaging in business as a real estate investment trust under Part II of Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time; the sale of its shares has been qualified at any time by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to the Corporate Securities Law of 1968; and in good faith it has commenced business as a real estate investment trust.

An unincorporated association or trust that otherwise meets the requirements of this section shall not
 be affected in its status as a real estate investment trust, regardless of whether it is in fact taxable for any year or years under Part II of Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 68.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.

No shareowner of a real estate investment trust shall be personally liable as such for any liabilities, debts or obligations of, or claims against, the real estate investment trust, whether arising before or after such shareowner became the owner or holder of the shares thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.

Section 23001 shall apply to any real estate investment trust organized under the laws of this state with respect to liabilities, debts, obligations and claims wherever arising, and to any real estate investment trust organized under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction with respect to liabilities, debts, obligations and claims arising in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.

A real estate investment trust shall not issue any security redeemable at the option of the holder of the security.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

23004.

Section 23001 shall apply with respect to all liabilities, debts, obligations of, and claims against, a real estate investment trust arising after the effective date of this part, and prior law shall continue to govern with respect to liabilities, debts, obligations and claims existing on the effective date of this part. No implication shall be created by the adoption of this part that the holders or owners of shares of beneficial interest in business trusts which do not meet the definition of real estate investment trust in Section 23000 are, or are not, as such, personally liable for the liabilities, debts or obligations of, or claims against, any such trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

23005.

The provisions of Sections 1400 and 1402 governing bankruptcy reorganizations for corporations also apply to real estate investment trusts. For that purpose where the term “corporation” is used in such sections it shall also include the term “real estate investment trust,” the terms “director” or “board of directors” shall include “trustee” or “board of trustees,” the term “articles” shall include “declaration of trust” and the term “capital stock” shall include “shares of beneficial interest.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 28.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

23006.

(a) The following entities may be merged pursuant to this article:

(1) Any two or more real estate investment trusts into one real estate investment trust, provided that the merger is specifically permitted by the declarations of trust, and that procedure is detailed in those declarations.

(2) One or more real estate investment trusts with one or more limited partnerships into one limited partnership, provided that the merger is specifically permitted by the declarations of trust, and that procedure is detailed in those declarations.

(3) One or more real estate investment trusts with one or more limited partnerships into one real estate investment trust, provided that the merger is specifically permitted by the declarations of trust, and that procedure is detailed in those declarations.

(b) Any merger under this section shall only be effective upon the approval of the holders of a majority of the shares of beneficial interest of the real estate investment trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1023, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. LIABILITY OF DIRECTOR OR OFFICER OF NONPROFIT MEDICAL ASSOCIATION [24001.5. - 24001.5.]

24001.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the services of directors or officers of nonprofit medical associations, as defined in Section 21200, who serve without compensation are critical to the efficient conduct and management of the public service and charitable affairs of the people of California. The willingness of volunteers to offer their services has been deterred by a perception that their personal assets are at risk for these activities. The unavailability and unaffordability of appropriate liability insurance makes it difficult for these associations to protect the personal assets of their volunteer decisionmakers with adequate insurance. It is the public policy of this state to provide incentive and protection to the individuals who perform these important functions.

(b) Except as provided in this section, no cause of action for monetary damages shall arise against any person serving without compensation as a director or officer of a nonprofit medical association, as defined in Section 21200, on account of any negligent act or omission occurring (1) within the scope of that person’s duties as a director acting as a board member, or within the scope of that person’s duties as an officer acting in an official capacity; (2) in good faith; (3) in a manner that the person believes to be in the best interest of the association; and (4) is in the exercise of his or her policymaking judgment.

(c) This section shall not limit the liability of a director or officer for any of the following:

(1) Self-dealing transactions, as described in Sections 5233 and 9243.

(2) Conflicts of interest, as described in Section 7233.

(3) Actions described in Sections 5237, 7236, and 9245.

(4) In the case of a charitable trust, an action or proceeding against a trustee brought by a beneficiary of that trust.

(5) Any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General.

(6) Intentional, wanton, or reckless acts, gross negligence, or an action based on fraud, oppression, or malice.

(7) Any action brought under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) This section only applies
 to nonprofit organizations organized to provide charitable, educational, scientific, social, or other forms of public service that are exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) This section applies only if the nonprofit association maintains a liability insurance policy with an amount of coverage of at least the following amounts:

(1) If the association’s annual budget is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the minimum required amount is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) If the association’s annual budget equals or exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the minimum required amount is one million dollars ($1,000,000).

This section applies only if the liability insurance policy is
 applicable to the claim.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the payment of actual expenses incurred in attending meetings or otherwise in the execution of the duties of a director or officer shall not constitute compensation.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability of a nonprofit association for any negligent act or omission of a director, officer, employee, agent, or servant occurring within the scope of his or her duties.

(h) This section does not apply to any association that unlawfully restricts membership, services, or benefits conferred on the basis of political affiliation, age, or any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(i) This section does not apply to any
 volunteer director or officer who receives compensation from the association in any other capacity, including, but not limited to, as an employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 52.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 4. SECURITIES [25000. - 31528.]



DIVISION 1. CORPORATE SECURITIES LAW OF 1968 [25000. - 25707.]



  PART 1. DEFINITIONS [25000. - 25023.]

25000.

This division may be known as the “Corporate Securities Law of 1968.”

References herein to “this law” refer to the applicable provisions of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this part apply throughout this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25002.

“Advertisement” means any written or printed communication or any communication by means of recorded telephone messages or spoken on radio, television, or similar communications media, published in connection with the offer or sale of a security.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.

(a) “Agent” means any individual, other than a broker-dealer or a partner of a licensed broker-dealer, who represents a broker-dealer or who for compensation represents an issuer in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of securities in this state.

(b) “Agent” does not include an individual who only represents an issuer in effecting transactions in securities exempted by subdivision (a), (b), (e), (f), (g), (j), (k), or (l) of Section 25100 or in effecting transactions exempted by Section 25102, and does not
 include an individual who has no place of business in this state if he or she effects transactions in this state exclusively with broker-dealers.

(c) “Agent” does not include an associated person of a broker or dealer effecting transactions described in Section 15(i)(4) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, subject to the provisions of Section 15(i)(3) of that act.

(d) An officer or director of a broker-dealer or issuer, or an individual occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, is an agent only if he or she otherwise comes within this definition and receives compensation specifically related to purchases or sales of securities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 12.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.5.

“Business days” are all days other than every Saturday, every Sunday, and such other days as are specified or provided for as holidays in the Government Code of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.

(a) “Broker-dealer” means any person engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities in this state for the account of others or for that person’s own account. “Broker-dealer” also includes a person engaged in the regular business of issuing or guaranteeing options with regard to securities not of that person’s own issue. “Broker-dealer” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any other issuer.

(2) An agent, when an employee of a broker-dealer or issuer.

(3) A bank, trust company, or savings and loan association.

(4) Any person insofar as that person buys
 or sells securities for that person’s own account, either individually or in some fiduciary capacity, but not as part of a regular business.

(5) A person who has no place of business in this state if that person effects transactions in this state exclusively with (A) the issuers of the securities involved in the transactions or (B) other broker-dealers.

(6) A broker licensed by the Real Estate Commissioner of this state when engaged in transactions in securities exempted by subdivision (f) or (p) of Section 25100 or in securities the issuance of which is subject to authorization by the Real Estate Commissioner of this state or in transactions exempted by subdivision (e) of Section 25102.

(7) An exchange certified by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to this section when it is issuing or
 guaranteeing options. The commissioner may by order certify an exchange under this section upon those conditions as the commissioner by rule or order deems appropriate, and upon notice and opportunity to be heard the commissioner may suspend or revoke that certification, if the commissioner finds that certification, suspension, or revocation to be in the public interest and necessary and appropriate for the protection of investors.

(b) For purposes of this section, an agent is an employee of a broker-dealer under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) when the agent is employed by or associated with the broker-dealer under all of the following conditions:

(1) The agent is subject to the supervision and control of the broker-dealer.

(2) The agent performs under the name, authority, and marketing policies of the
 broker-dealer.

(3) The agent discloses to investors the identity of the broker-dealer.

(4) The agent is reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25210 and the rules adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 69.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 70.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.1.

“Entity conversion transaction” means a conversion pursuant to Section 1151, 1157, 15911.02, 15911.08, 16902, 16908, 17710.02, or 17710.08 or a conversion that occurs entirely out of state, unless the interests in the entity resulting from the conversion to be held by the equity holders of the entity being converted as a result of the conversion are not securities. For purposes of Sections 25103 and 25120 an entity conversion transaction is not a change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities or an exchange of securities by the issuer with its existing security holders exclusively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 21.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

25006.

“Fraud,” “deceit,” and “defraud” are not limited to common law fraud or deceit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25007.

“Guaranteed” means guaranteed as to payment of principal, interest, dividends, or call premium.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25008.

(a) An offer or sale of a security is made in this state when an offer to sell is made in this state, or an offer to buy is accepted in this state, or (if both the seller and the purchaser are domiciled in this state) the security is delivered to the purchaser in this state. An offer to buy or a purchase of a security is made in this state when an offer to buy is made in this state, or an offer to sell is accepted in this state, or (if both the seller and the purchaser are domiciled in this state) the security is delivered to the purchaser in this state.

(b) An offer to sell or to buy is made in this state when the offer either originates from this state or is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed. An offer to buy or to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state; and acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state when the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it is directed. A security is delivered to the purchaser in this state when the certificate or other evidence of the security is directed to the purchaser in this state and received at the place to which it is directed.

(c) An offer to sell or to buy is not made in this state merely because (1) the publisher circulates or there is circulated on his behalf in this state any bona fide newspaper or other publication of general, regular and paid circulation which has had more than two-thirds of its circulation outside this state during the past 12 months, or (2) a radio or television program originating outside this state is received in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25009.

(a) “Investment adviser” means any person who, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, publishes analyses or reports concerning securities. “Investment adviser” does not include (1) a bank, trust company or savings and loan association; (2) an attorney at law, accountant, engineer or teacher whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the practice of his or her profession; (3) an associated person of an investment adviser; (4) a broker-dealer or agent of a broker-dealer whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the conduct of the business of a broker-dealer and who receives no special compensation for them; or (5) a publisher of any bona fide newspaper, news magazine or business or financial publication of general, regular and paid circulation and the agents and servants thereof, but this paragraph (5) does not exclude any such person who engages in any other activity which would constitute that person an investment adviser within the meaning of this section.

(b) “Investment adviser” also includes any person who uses the title “financial planner” and who, for compensation, engages in the business, whether principally or as part of another business, of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as part of a regular business, publishes analyses or reports concerning securities. This subdivision does not apply to: (1) a bank, trust company, or savings and loan association; (2) an attorney at law, accountant, engineer, or teacher whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the practice of his or her profession, so long as these individuals do not use the title “financial planner;” (3) an associated person of an investment adviser where the investment adviser is licensed or exempt from licensure under this law; (4) an agent of a broker-dealer where the broker-dealer is licensed or exempt from licensure under this law, so long as (A) the performance of these services by the agent is solely incidental to the conduct of the business of the broker-dealer, and (B) the agent receives no special compensation for the performance of these services; or (5) a publisher set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), so long as the publisher or the agents and servants of the publisher are not engaged in any other activity which would constitute that person an investment adviser within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

25009.1.

“Investment adviser” does not include persons excepted from the definition of “investment adviser” by Section 202(a)(11) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. 80a-1 et seq., as amended), except that with regard to those persons the commissioner may investigate and bring enforcement actions with respect to fraud and deceit, including and without limitation fraud and deceit under Section 25235, and any rules of the commissioner adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25009.5.

(a) “Investment adviser representative” or “associated person of an investment adviser” means any partner, officer, director of (or a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions) or other individual, except clerical or ministerial personnel, who is employed by or associated with, or subject to the supervision and control of, an investment adviser that has obtained a certificate or that is required to obtain a certificate under this law, and who does any of the following:

(1) Makes any recommendations or otherwise renders advice regarding securities.

(2) Manages accounts or portfolios of clients.

(3) Determines which recommendation or advice regarding securities should be given.

(4) Solicits, offers, or negotiates for the sale or sells investment advisory services.

(5) Supervises employees who perform any of the foregoing.

(b) “Investment adviser representative” means, with respect to an investment adviser subject to Section 25230.1, a person defined as an investment adviser representative by Rule 203A-3 of the Securities and Exchange Commission (17 C.F.R. 275.203A-3) and who has a place of business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25010.

“Issuer” means any person who issues or proposes to issue any security, except that:

(a) With respect to certificates of deposit, voting trust certificates or collateral-trust certificates, or with respect to certificates of interest or shares in an unincorporated investment trust not having a board of directors or persons performing similar functions or of the fixed, restricted management or unit type, “issuer” means the person or persons performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or manager pursuant to the provisions of the trust or other agreement or instrument under which the security is issued. However, with respect to equipment-trust certificates or like securities, “issuer” means the person by whom the equipment or property is or is to be used.

(b) With respect to certificates of interest or participation in oil, gas or mining titles or leases or in payments out of production under those titles or leases, “issuer” means the person or persons in active control of the exploration or development of the property who sell those interests or participations or payments or any person or persons who subdivide and sell those interests or participations or payments. The determination of the person or persons in active control of the exploration or development of the property shall be made on the basis of the actual relationship of the parties and not on the basis of the legal designation of a person’s interest.

(c) With respect to a fractional or pooled interest in a viatical or life settlement contract, “issuer” means the person who creates, for the purposes of sale, the fractional or pooled interest. In the case of a viatical or life settlement contract that is not fractionalized or pooled, “issuer” means the person effecting the transactions with the investors in those contracts.

(d) In the case of an unincorporated association which provides by its articles for limited liability of any or all of its members, or in the case of a trust, committee, or other legal entity, the trustees or members thereof shall not be individually liable as issuers of any security issued by the association, trust, committee, or other legal entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 705, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25011.

“Nonissuer transaction” means any transaction not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the issuer. A transaction is indirectly for the benefit of the issuer if any portion of the purchase price of any securities involved in the transaction will be received indirectly by the issuer. An offering which involves both an issuer transaction and a nonissuer transaction shall be treated for the purposes of Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 25110) and 4 (commencing with Section 25130) of Part 2 of this division as an issuer transaction, but for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of Part 2 of this division they shall be treated as separate transactions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25012.

“Owners’ association” means a nonprofit corporation or association created to own or lease the commonly owned lots, parcels or areas referred to in clause (a) of Section 25015, or to provide management, maintenance, preservation or control of either such lots, parcels or areas or of the separately owned lots, parcels or areas, or both, or any portion of or interest in them, or interest subject to subdivision (g) of Section 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code, if the shares or certificates of membership therein are transferable only by transfer of the interests in the lots, parcels or areas. Such shares of stock or memberships shall be considered interests in a real estate development or in subdivided lands or a subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 698, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25013.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

25014.

“Publish” means publicly to issue or circulate by newspaper, mail, radio or television, or otherwise to disseminate to the public.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25014.5.

“Rollup participant” means a finite-life limited partnership.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 25014.6, a limited partnership has “finite-life” if both of the following apply:

(1) It operates as a conduit vehicle for investors to participate in the ownership of assets for a limited period of time.

(2) It has a policy or purpose of distributing to investors substantially all proceeds from the sale, financing, or refinancing of assets, whether for the term of the partnership or after an initial period of time following commencement of operations, rather than reinvesting those proceeds in the business.

(b) Rollup participant does not include any partnership registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 or any business development company as defined in Section 80a-2(48) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1183, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

25014.6.

“Rollup transaction” means any transaction or series of transactions that directly or indirectly through acquisition or otherwise involves the combination or reorganization of one or more rollup participants and is one of the following:

(a) The offer or sale of securities by a successor entity, whether newly formed or previously existing, to one or more investors of the rollup participants to be combined or reorganized.
